North Dakota, session 69, SB2199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subsection to section 20.1-03-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is
created and enacted as follows:
A resident disabled veteran who has a one hundred percent service-connected
disability as determined by the department of veterans' affairs shall receive one bonus
point each year to an application for a deer license issued by lottery. Bonus points
received under this section are in addition to any other bonus points received by the
department and must reset after receiving a deer license issued by lottery.
Page No. 1 25.0513.02000